Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 1

Emergency Communications District Law

7-86-101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Emergency Communications District Law.”

Acts 1984, ch. 867, § 1.

Cross-References. Disasters, emergencies and civil defense, title 58, ch. 2.

References to 911 service restricted, §47-50-116.

Attorney General Opinions. Creation of municipal emergency communications district, OAG 93-72, 1993 Tenn. AG LEXIS 74 (12/28/93).

Emergency dispatchers: conflicts of interest, OAG 99-219, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 179 (11/4/99).

The Emergency Communications District Law does not permit use of district funds for purposes other than 911, OAG 07-128 (8/27/07).

7-86-102. Legislative declaration and intent.

The general assembly finds and declares that the establishment of a uniform emergency number to shorten the time required for a citizen to request and receive emergency aid is a matter of public concern and interest. The general assembly finds and declares that the establishment of the number 911 as the primary emergency telephone number provides a single, primary, three-digit emergency telephone number through which emergency service can be quickly and efficiently obtained, and make a significant contribution to law enforcement and other public service efforts requiring quick notification of public service personnel. It is the intent to provide a simplified means of securing emergency services, which will result in saving of life, a reduction in the destruction of property, quicker apprehension of criminals and, ultimately, the saving of money.

The general assembly finds that the establishment of a uniform emergency number to shorten the time required for a citizen to request and receive emergency aid is a matter of public interest and concern. The general assembly finds also that the continued viability of the lifesaving 911 emergency communications service is of the highest priority for the health and safety of the citizens of Tennessee.

The general assembly further finds that the effectiveness of 911 service depends on the ability of emergency service providers to timely respond to persons requiring emergency assistance; further, that the response by such providers is directly affected by the nature and coverage of the telephone and radio communications network available within a community, the quality of which is often limited by the availability of financial resources in the community.

The general assembly further finds that rapid technological advancements have provided the public with non-wireline services, including, but not limited to, commercial mobile radio service (CMRS) and IP-enabled service, which are capable of connecting users dialing or entering the digits 911 to public safety answering points (PSAPs). The general assembly also finds that in various rules and orders, the federal communications commission (FCC) has mandated wireless enhanced 911 service for all CMRS users and subscribers. The FCC also has addressed enhanced 911 service requirements for IP-enabled service. The general assembly recognizes that all subscribers and users of non-wireline services, including CMRS and IP-enabled service, which are capable of connecting users dialing or entering the digits 911 to PSAPs should share in the benefits of 911 service and should participate in the funding of the service.

Further, the general assembly finds that, while a competitive market for the public safety answering point equipment associated with the provision of 911 service is in the public interest, limited oversight by the Tennessee public utility commission of the provision of such equipment is also in the public interest. Therefore, public safety answering point equipment shall be regulated by the commission only for the purpose of adopting standards for the equipment and for the protection of proprietary customer specific information and to assure the integrity of 911 service and the privacy and safety of Tennesseans; provided, that such standards shall be consistent with the FCC Part 68 standards.

It is the intent that all funds received by the district are public funds and are limited to purposes for the furtherance of this part. The funds received by the district are to be used to obtain emergency services for law enforcement and other public service efforts requiring emergency notification of public service personnel, and the funds received from all sources shall be used exclusively in the operation of the emergency communications district.

Acts 1984, ch. 867, § 2; 1993, ch. 411, § 1; 1993, ch. 479, § 1; 1995, ch. 305, § 85; 1998, ch. 1108, § 2; 2006, ch. 925, § 1; 2017, ch. 94, §§ 21, 82.

Compiler's Notes. FCC Part 68 standards referred to in this section may be found in 47 CFR Part 68.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (c), substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in the first sentence and substituted “the commission” for “the authority” in the last sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

7-86-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“911 service” means regular 911 service enhanced universal emergency number service or enhanced 911 service that is a telephone exchange communications service whereby a public safety answering point may receive telephone calls dialed to the telephone number 911. “911 service” includes lines and may include the equipment necessary for the answering, transferring and dispatching of public emergency telephone calls originated by persons within the serving area who dial 911, but does not include dial tone first from pay telephones that may be made available by the service provider based on the ability to recover the costs associated with its implementation and consistent with tariffs filed with the Tennessee public utility commission;

“911 surcharge” means the surcharge that is required to be collected from consumers under § 7-86-128(a);

“Appropriate county or municipality” means the legislative body of the county or municipality that, by resolution or ordinance, respectively, created the emergency communications district;

“Automatic dialer” means an unattended customer premise device or equipment that generates pulses or tones that activate telephone company central office equipment and causes the calling line to be connected with the telephone line of the called number;

“Commercial mobile radio service” or “CMRS” means commercial mobile radio service under §§ 3(27) and 332(d) of the Federal Telecommunications Act of 1996 (47 U.S.C. 151, et seq.), the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1993, and 47 CFR 20.9, and includes service provided by any wireless two-way communication device, including radio telephone communication used in cellular telephone service, personal communication service, or the functional or competitive equivalent of a radio-telephone communications line used in cellular telephone service, a personal communication service, or a network access line. “Commercial mobile radio service” also includes, but is not limited to, any and all broadband personal communications service, cellular radio telephone service, geographic area specialized mobile radio (SMR) services in all bands that offer real-time, two-way voice service that is interconnected with the public switched network, incumbent wide area SMR service, or any other cellular or wireless telecommunications service. Nothing in this definition shall be construed to require compliance by any amateur radio operator or such radio system;

“Commercial mobile radio service provider” means any person, corporation, or entity licensed by the federal communications commission to offer CMRS in the state of Tennessee, and includes, but is not limited to, broadband personal communications service, cellular radio telephone service, geographic area SMR services in the 800 MHz and 900 MHz bands that offer real-time, two-way voice service that is interconnected with the public switched network, incumbent wide area SMR licensees, or any other cellular or wireless telecommunications service to any service user;

“Communications service” means a service that:

Is capable of contacting and has been enabled to contact a public safety answering point (PSAP) via a 911 network by entering or dialing the digits 911;

Is a “telecommunications service” as defined by § 67-6-102; and

Is neither “prepaid calling service” nor “prepaid wireless calling service” as defined in § 67-6-102;

“Consumer” means a person who purchases retail communications service or prepaid communications services in a retail transaction;

“Dealer” has the meaning set forth in § 67-6-102;

“Direct dispatch method” means a 911 service in which a public service answering point, upon receipt of a telephone request for emergency services, provides for the dispatch of appropriate emergency service units and a decision as to the proper action to be taken;

“District” means any emergency communications district created pursuant to this part;

“Exchange access facilities” means all lines, provided by the service supplier for the provision of exchange telephone service, as defined in existing general subscriber services tariffs filed by the service supplier with the Tennessee public utility commission;

“Federal communications commission order” means the Order of the Federal Communications Commission, FCC Docket 94-102, adopted on June 12, 1996, and released on July 26, 1996, and any subsequent amendments, and includes other federal communications commission rules and orders relating to CMRS providers, CMRS, and wireless enhanced 911 service;

“IP-enabled services” means services and applications making use of Internet protocol (IP) including, but not limited to, voice over IP and other services and applications provided through wireline, cable, wireless, and satellite facilities, and any other facility that may be provided in the future through platforms that may not be deployable at present, that are capable of connecting users dialing or entering the digits 911 to public safety answering points (PSAPs);

“Non-wireline service” means any service provided by any person, corporation or entity, other than a service supplier as defined in this part, that connects a user dialing or entering the digits 911 to a PSAP, including, but not limited to, commercial mobile radio service and IP-enabled services;

“Prepaid communications service” means “prepaid wireless calling service”, as set forth in § 67-6-102, that is capable of contacting a PSAP by entering or dialing the digits 911;

“Prepaid wireless telecommunications service” means a wireless telecommunications service that allows a caller to dial 911 to access the 911 system, which service must be paid for in advance and is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in a known amount;

“Public safety answering point” or “PSAP” means a facility that has been designated to receive 911 phone calls and route them to emergency services personnel pursuant to § 7-86-107(b);

“Public safety emergency services provider” means any municipality or county government that provides emergency services to the public. Such providers or services include, but are not limited to, emergency fire protection, law enforcement, police protection, emergency medical services, poison control, animal control, suicide prevention, and emergency rescue management;

“Relay method” means a 911 service in which a public safety answering point, upon receipt of a telephone request for emergency services, notes the pertinent information from the caller and relays such information to the appropriate public safety agency or other agencies or other providers of emergency service for dispatch of an emergency unit;

“Retail sale” has the meaning set forth in § 67-6-102;

“Sales price” has the meaning set forth in § 67-6-102;

“Service supplier” means any person, corporation or entity providing exchange telephone service to any service user;

“Service user” means any person, corporation or entity that is provided 911 service;

“Tariff rate” means the flat monthly recurring rate for one-party residence or business exchange access service within the base rate area of the principal exchange of the predominant service supplier within the geographical confines of the district, as stated in such service supplier's tariffs filed with the Tennessee public utility commission, but does not include taxes, fees, licenses, end-user access charges or any similar charges whatsoever;

“Transfer method” means a 911 service in which a public safety answering point, upon receipt of a telephone request for emergency services, directly transfers such request to an appropriate public safety agency or other provider of emergency services;

“Wireless enhanced 911 service” means service with location and number identification technology whereby users of non-wireline service may contact a PSAP by entering or dialing the digits 911; such service includes, but is not limited to, wireless enhanced 911 service as set forth in the federal communications commission order; and

“Wireless telecommunications service” means commercial mobile radio service as defined by 47 CFR 20.3.

Acts 1984, ch. 867, § 3; 1985, ch. 271, § 1; 1990, ch. 909, § 1; 1993, ch. 411, § 2; 1993, ch. 479, § 2; 1995, ch. 305, § 86; 1998, ch. 1108, §§ 3, 24; 2006, ch. 925, §§ 2-4; 2010, ch. 774, § 1; 2012, ch. 935, § 1; 2014, ch. 795, § 2; 2017, ch. 94, § 22.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 795, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “911 Funding Modernization and IP Transition Act of 2014”.

The Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1993 referenced in this section is Act Aug. 10, 1993, P.L. 103-66, which is codified throughout several titles of the U.S.C. It amends certain provisions of the Federal Telecommunications Act of 1996.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, added the definitions of “911 surcharge”, “communications service”, “consumer”, “dealer”, “prepaid communications service”, “retail sale”, and “sales price”.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” at the end of the definitions of “911 service” and “exchange access facilities” and in the definition of “tariff rate”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 795, § 15. January 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Statewide wireless enhanced 911 service, title 7, ch. 86, part 3.

Use of automatic dialer programmed to emergency number, §7-86-118.

Attorney General Opinions. Status of “911 tapes” under Public Records Act, OAG 93-65, 1993 Tenn. AG LEXIS 67 (11/29/93).

The E911 board may impose an emergency telephone service charge for each channel in a T-1 or PRI circuit that is capable of conveying an outbound voice telephone call from the service user to an E911 public safety answering point, OAG 07-038 (3/28/07).

7-86-104. Creation — Referendum.

The legislative body of any municipality or county may, by ordinance or resolution, respectively, create an emergency communications district within all or part of the boundaries of such municipality or county. Prior to the establishment of such district, an election shall be held as provided in subsection (b).

The legislative body of any municipality or county shall, by resolution, request the county election commission to submit to the voters within the boundaries of a proposed emergency communications district the question of creating such district in an election to be held pursuant to § 2-3-204. In the election, the questions submitted to the qualified voters shall be, “For the Emergency Communications District” or “Against the Emergency Communications District.” The county election commission shall certify the results of the election to such legislative body. The expenses of such election shall be paid by such local government.

Acts 1984, ch. 867, § 4; 1994, ch. 778, § 1.

7-86-105. Creation — Board of directors — Membership — Terms — Appointment of replacement.

Upon approval by a majority of the eligible voters within the area of the proposed district voting at such referendum, the legislative body may create an emergency communications district.

Except as otherwise provided by law, an emergency communications district shall have a board of directors composed of no fewer than seven (7) nor more than nine (9) members to govern the affairs of the district. For districts created by a county legislative body, the county mayor shall appoint the members of the board of directors subject to confirmation by the county legislative body. When the county mayor names an appointee to the board, the county legislative body has ninety (90) days or until the conclusion of its next regularly scheduled meeting, whichever is later, to confirm or reject the appointment. If the legislative body does not act within this time period, the appointment shall take effect without confirmation. In any municipality having a population of less than thirty thousand (30,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, having adopted home rule pursuant to the Constitution of Tennessee, Article XI, § 9, and having an incorporated area lying in two (2) counties, the board of directors may be the legislative body of such municipality, if the emergency services are provided by such municipality.

In any county having a metropolitan form of government and having a population of not less than four hundred thousand (400,000) nor more than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the chief executive officer of the metropolitan government may appoint a board of directors, composed of no fewer than seven (7) nor more than nine (9) members, subject to confirmation by the chief legislative body of the metropolitan government, which shall govern the affairs of the district. Appointments to the board of directors shall include members selected from minorities as well as members of the sex that historically has been underrepresented on boards and commissions of the metropolitan government.

In emergency communication districts established by counties with a population greater than three hundred thousand (300,000) and less than seven hundred fifty thousand (750,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, except in counties with a metropolitan form of government, the mayor, the chief of police and the fire chief of the municipality, or their representatives, with the largest population in the district, the county sheriff in the district, and the county mayor in the district, or their representatives, shall be members of the board of directors of the district. If, at the time this subdivision (b)(3) takes effect, any person or persons holding any one (1) of the positions mentioned in this subdivision (b)(3) is not a member of the board of directors of the district, then the board shall be immediately expanded to include such person or persons. In districts covered by this subsection (b), the legislative body may appoint up to eleven (11) members to govern the affairs of the district to allow for the appointment of two (2) additional directors, one (1) of whom shall be a woman and one (1) of whom shall be a representative of the nongovernmental emergency agencies servicing such district. Such additional members shall serve for an initial term of one (1) year. Each term thereafter shall be for a period of four (4) years. The method of appointment of the board of directors by the county legislative body referred to in this subdivision (b)(3) shall be by the confirmation process described in subdivision (b)(1).

Notwithstanding this subsection (b) to the contrary, in any county having a population of not less than forty-three thousand seven hundred (43,700) nor more than forty-three thousand eight hundred (43,800), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the legislative body may appoint an additional two (2) members to the board of directors for an initial term of two (2) years. Each term thereafter of such members shall be for a period of four (4) years.

Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, in any county having a population of not less than eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the county mayor may appoint a board of directors, composed of no fewer than seven (7) nor more than eleven (11) members, subject to confirmation by the chief legislative body of the county, which shall govern the affairs of the district. The county mayor and legislative body shall ensure that the views and opinions of all participating governmental entities are given full consideration in the selection of members of the board, with the exact methodology to be determined by local ordinance or resolution. The county mayor and legislative body shall make every effort to appoint members who represent the diversity of the community, including women and minorities.

In emergency communication districts established in any county having a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, one (1) of the members of the board of the directors of the district shall be an actively engaged firefighter, police officer or emergency medical technician; provided, that, if, on April 5, 1995, one (1) such person is not a member of the board in such county, when a vacancy occurs on the board or at the expiration of the term of office of a member of the board, at least one (1) person meeting the qualifications established in this subdivision (b)(6) shall be appointed to the board.

It is the public policy of this state to encourage the consolidation of emergency communications operations in order to provide the best possible technology and service to all areas of the state in the most economical and efficient manner possible. Pursuant to this policy, if two (2) or more counties, cities, or existing emergency communications districts, or any combination of these, desire to consolidate their emergency communications operations, a joint emergency communications district may be established by the parties using an interlocal agreement as authorized by title 5, chapter 1, part 1, and title 12, chapter 9; provided, that, notwithstanding the language of this subdivision (b)(7) or any other law to the contrary, no such consolidation of emergency communications operations shall result in the creation of a separate emergency communications district within the boundaries of an existing emergency communications district. Under such an agreement, the funding percentages for each party, and the size and appointment of the board of directors of such combined emergency communications district shall be determined by negotiation of the parties, notwithstanding this subsection (b) to the contrary; provided, that the board of directors of such combined district shall be composed of no fewer than seven (7) members to govern the affairs of the district. The terms, remuneration, and duties stated in subsections (c)-(i) shall apply to any board of directors of any combined emergency communications district.

Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, in any emergency communications district created by a municipality after July 1, 2002, the board of directors of the district may be the legislative body of such municipality. If the board of the directors of the district is comprised of the legislative body, then the terms of the members of the board of directors shall run concurrently with their terms as members of the legislative body. The terms of the members of the legislative body shall run concurrently with their terms as members on the board of directors.

In the event subdivision (b)(8)(A) is in effect for an emergency communications district, and any member of the emergency communications district board is removed pursuant to § 7-86-314, then the mayor shall appoint a private citizen to serve in the member's place until such time as the replaced member no longer serves on the legislative body of the municipality. Such appointment shall be subject to confirmation by the remaining members of the board of directors of the district.

In the event subdivision (b)(8)(A) is in effect for an emergency communications district, and the entire emergency communications district board is removed pursuant to § 7-86-314, then the mayor shall appoint private citizens to serve in each such member's place until such time as the replaced members no longer serve on the legislative body of the municipality. Such appointment shall be subject to confirmation by the board.

Nothing in this subdivision (b)(8) shall be construed to be contrary to § 7-86-310.

The members shall serve for a term of four (4) years. The initial members shall be appointed for staggered terms of two (2), three (3) and four (4) years, dating from the effective date of the ordinance or resolution creating such district. Members shall serve until a successor is duly appointed and, if required by this section or any other law, confirmed.

The members shall serve without compensation.

The board of directors shall have complete and sole authority to appoint a chair and any other officers the board may deem necessary from among the membership of the board of directors.

A majority of the board of directors shall constitute a quorum, and all official action of the board shall require a quorum.

The board has the authority to employ such employees, experts and consultants as the board may deem necessary to assist the board in the discharge of its responsibilities to the extent that funds are made available.

The board has the authority to establish or make available for the benefit and welfare of the board's employees such pension, insurance or other employee benefit plans as the board may deem appropriate, including participation in the Tennessee consolidated retirement system in accordance with title 8, chapter 35, part 2.

No member of the board of directors shall be an employee of the emergency communications district.

Acts 1984, ch. 867, § 5; 1986, ch. 784, § 1; 1987, ch. 94, § 3; 1988, ch. 884, § 1; 1989, ch. 243, § 1; 1990, ch. 809, §§ 1-4; 1991, ch. 283, § 1; 1992, ch. 891, § 2; 1993, ch. 479, § 10; 1995, ch. 68, § 5; 1996, ch. 696, § 1; 1998, ch. 1108, § 28; 2001, ch. 149, §§ 1, 2; 2002, ch. 567, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2005, ch. 64, § 1; 2007, ch. 55, § 1; 2013, ch. 34, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Disasters, emergencies and civil defense, title 58, ch. 2.

Immunity of board members, §29-20-108.

Attorney General Opinions. Appointment of county commissioner to emergency district board, OAG 94-013, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 8 (2/3/94).

Manner of appointing board of directors, OAG 94-024, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (3/9/94).

Joint agreement for emergency communication services, OAG 04-065, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 63 (4/15/04).

The automatic removal provisions of T.C.A. §7-86-314(a) apply, by their plain language, to ex officio emergency communications district (ECD) board members. This does not create any conflict with the requirement of T.C.A. §7-86-105(b)(3) that certain officials serve ex officio as ECD board members. The statute allows those ex officio membership positions to be filled either by the specified official or by a representative of that official. Thus, when an ex officio membership position is vacant because the specified official was automatically removed from the board, the statutory ex officio membership requirement is nevertheless fully satisfied when that position is filled by a representative of the official. OAG 16-39, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 39 (10/11/2016).

7-86-106. Status — Corporate powers — Charges not taxes.

The emergency communications district so created shall be a “municipality” or public corporation in perpetuity under its corporate name, and the district shall in that name be a body politic and corporate with power of perpetual succession, but without any power to levy or collect taxes. Charges for services authorized in this chapter shall not be construed as taxes and shall be payable as bona fide service charges by all service users, whether private or public, profit making, or not-for-profit, including governmental entities. The powers of each district shall be vested in and exercised by a majority of the members of the board of directors of the district.

Acts 1984, ch. 867, § 6; 1987, ch. 94, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. County policy relating to attendance of members of county boards does not apply to the board of directors of an emergency communications district, OAG 09-013 (2/6/09).

7-86-107. Response methods to emergency calls — Digits 911 — Backup numbers.

The board of directors of the district shall create an emergency communications service designed to have the capability of utilizing at least one (1) of the following three (3) methods in response to emergency calls:

Direct dispatch method;

Relay method; or

Transfer method.

The board of directors of the district shall elect the method that it determines to be the most feasible for the district.

Each public safety emergency services provider retains the right to dispatch its own services, unless a voluntary agreement is made between such provider and the board of directors of the emergency communications district.

The primary emergency telephone number is the digits “911”.

The board of directors has the authority to subscribe to the appropriate telephone services from the service supplier.

The involved agencies may maintain a separate secondary backup number and shall maintain a separate number for nonemergency telephone calls.

No service supplier shall be required to provide 911 service if the equipment for such service is not available.

Acts 1984, ch. 867, § 7; 1998, ch. 1108, §§ 25-27.

7-86-108. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 7-86-108 (Acts 1984, ch. 867, § 8; 1985, ch. 271, §§ 2, 3; 1987, ch. 94, § 4; 1989, ch. 9, § 1; 1993, ch. 419, § 1; 1993, ch. 479, § 3; 1994, ch. 778, § 2; 1995, ch. 68, § 1; 1998, ch. 1108, § 6; 2002, ch. 719, § 7; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2003, ch. 205, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 925, § 5; 2010, ch. 774, §§ 2, 4; 2010, ch. 1030, § 8.) concerning emergency telephone service charges; legislative levy decrease; and data service and billing was repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 795, § 3, effective January 1, 2015.

Acts 2014, ch. 795, § 1 provided that the act, which repealed this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “911 Funding Modernization and IP Transition Act of 2014”.

7-86-109. Additional funding.

In order to provide additional funding for the district and the service, the governing body of the district may receive funds from federal, state and local government sources, as well as funds from private sources, including funds from the issuance of bonds, and may expend such funds for the purposes of this part. Any legislative body of a municipality or county creating a district under the terms of this chapter may appropriate funds to the district to assist in the establishment, operations and maintenance of such district.

Acts 1984, ch. 867, § 9.

7-86-110. [Repealed.]

Acts 1984, ch. 867, § 10; 1987, ch. 94, § 2; 2014, ch. 795, § 5; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 1047, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former Section 7-86-110, concerning 911 surcharge collections and remittance, was repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 1047, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, rewrote the section which read: “(a) The service supplier shall remit the funds collected as the service charge to the district every two (2) months. Such funds shall be remitted to the district no later than thirty (30) days after the last business day of such two-month period.“(b) The service supplier shall be entitled to retain as an administrative fee an amount equal to three percent (3%) of the collections of the service charge.“(c) The service supplier or the board of directors of the district shall be authorized to demand payment from any service user who fails to pay any proper service charge, and may take legal action, if necessary, to collect the service charge from such service user, or may, in the alternative, and without any liability whatsoever to such service user for any losses or damages that result from termination, terminate all service to such service user; provided, that any service user so terminated shall have the right to resume service from the service supplier as long as the service user is otherwise in compliance with the regulation of the service supplier, upon full payment of all past due service charges and any other costs or expenses, including reasonable interest, or normal costs or charges of the service supplier for the resumption of service, incurred by the service supplier and the district as the result of any nonpayment.“(d) However, the service supplier shall annually provide to the board of directors of the district an accounting of the amounts billed and collected and of the disposition of such amounts.“(e) Good faith compliance by the service supplier with this chapter shall constitute a complete defense to any legal action or claim against the service supplier arising in connection with this part.”

Cross-References. Audits, §7-86-113.

Tennessee Claims Commission, Tit. 9, ch. 8, part 3.

7-86-111. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §7-86-111 (Acts 1984, ch. 867, § 11; 1995, ch. 305, § 87), concerning billing and payment of charges, and §7-86-112 (Acts 1984, § ch. 867, § 12), concerning adjustment of rates and charges, were repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 795, § 3, effective January 1, 2015.

Acts 2014, ch. 795, § 1 provided that the act, which repealed these sections, shall be known and may be cited as the “911 Funding Modernization and IP Transition Act of 2014”.

7-86-112. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §7-86-112 (Acts 1984, ch. 867, § 12), concerning adjustment of rates and charges, was repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 795, § 3, effective January 1, 2015.

Acts 2014, ch. 795, § 1 provided that the act, which repeals this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “911 Funding Modernization and IP Transition Act of 2014”.

7-86-113. Audits.

The board of directors of each district shall cause an annual audit to be made of the books and records of the district. Within thirty (30) days after receipt by the district, a copy of the annual audit shall be filed with the clerk or recorder of the appropriate county or municipality who shall then distribute copies to members of the appropriate legislative body. Within thirty (30) days after receipt by the district, a copy of the annual audit shall also be filed with the chief administrative officer of the appropriate county or municipality. The comptroller of the treasury, through the department of audit, shall be responsible for determining that such audits are prepared in accordance with generally accepted governmental auditing standards and that such audits meet the minimum standards prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury. The comptroller of the treasury, through the department of audit, shall also prescribe procedures such as are required to assure that the books and records are kept in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

These audits shall be prepared by certified public accountants, public accountants or by the department of audit. In the event the governing body of the district shall fail or refuse to have the audit prepared, then the comptroller of the treasury may appoint a certified public accountant, or public accountant or direct the department of audit to prepare the audit, the cost of such audit to be paid by the district.

The comptroller of the treasury is authorized to modify the requirements for an audit as set out in this section for any districts whose activity, in the comptroller of the treasury's judgment, is not sufficient to justify the expenses of a complete audit. Furthermore, the comptroller of the treasury is authorized to direct the department of audit to make an audit of financial review of the books and records of districts.

Acts 1984, ch. 867, § 13; 1993, ch. 479, § 4; 2018, ch. 495, § 5.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote the last sentence in (a) which read: “The comptroller of the treasury shall promulgate such rules and regulations as are required to assure that the books and records are kept in accordance with generally accepted accounting procedures and that audit standards prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury are met.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 495, § 11. February 22, 2018.

Cross-References. Accounting by service supplier, §7-86-110.